Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1401.07
Bona fide consumer, defined.

Bona fide consumer
means an owner of a motor vehicle, motorcycle, or trailer who has acquired
such vehicle for use in business or for pleasure purposes, who has been granted
a certificate of title on such motor vehicle, motorcycle, or trailer, and
who has registered such motor vehicle, motorcycle, or trailer, all in accordance
with the laws of the residence of the owner, except that no owner who sells
more than eight registered motor vehicles, motorcycles, or trailers within
a twelve-month period shall qualify as a bona fide consumer.

Laws 2010, LB816, § 19.